en: Palette knife blade edge profile: Beveled; Notched; Pointed; Rounded; Square; Straight; Tapered; Other
da: Paletknivbladets kantprofil: Affaset; Takket; Spids; Afrundet; Firkantet; Lige; Tilspidset; Anden
bg-BG: Профил на ръба на острието на палитрен нож: Скосен; Назъбен; Остър; Заоблен; Квадратен; Прав; Заострен; Друго
th: ลักษณะขอบใบมีดของมีดเกรียง: ลบมุม; หยัก; ปลายแหลม; โค้งมน; ตัดตรง; ตรง; เรียว; อื่นๆ
cs: Profil ostří čepele špachtle: Zkosený; Zubatý; Špičatý; Zaoblený; Čtvercový; Rovný; Zúžený; Jiné
nl: Paletmes lemmet randprofiel: Afgeschuind; Getand; Puntig; Afgerond; Vierkant; Recht; Taps toelopend; Overig
sk-SK: Profil ostria/hrany čepele maliarskej špachtle: Skosený; Zúbkovaný; Špicatý; Zaoblený; Hranatý; Rovný; Zúžený; Iné
ro-RO: Profilul muchiei lamei cuțitului de paletă: Teșit; Zimțat; Ascuțit; Rotunjit; Pătrat; Drept; Conic; Altele
fi: Palettiveitsen terän profiili: Viistetty; Lovettu; Terävä; Pyöristetty; Neliö; Suora; Kavennettu; Muu
hu: Festőkés pengeszélének profilja: Fazettás; Fogazott; Hegyes; Lekerekített; Szögletes; Egyenes; Kúpos; Egyéb
ko: 팔레트 나이프 날 가장자리 프로필: 경사진 모서리; 노치형; 뾰족한 모서리; 둥근 모서리; 정사각형; 직선형; 테이퍼형; 기타
it: Profilo del bordo della lama della spatola: Smussato; Dentellato; A punta; Arrotondato; Quadrato; Dritto; Affusolato; Altro
ru: Профиль кромки мастихина: Скошенный; Зубчатый; Остроконечный; Закругленный; Квадратный; Прямой; Сужающийся; Другое
ja: パレットナイフの刃先プロファイル: ベベル; ノッチ; ポインテッド; ラウンド; スクエア; ストレート; テーパード; その他
fr: Profil du bord de la lame du couteau à palette: Biseauté; Cranté; Pointu; Arrondi; Carré; Droit; Fuselé; Autre
sv: Palettknivbladets kantprofil: Fasad; Tandad; Spetsig; Rundad; Kvadratisk; Rak; Avsmalnande; Övrigt
pt-PT: perfil da borda da lâmina da espátula: Biselado; Entalhado; Pontiagudo; Arredondado; Quadrado; Reto; Afunilado; Outro
lt-LT: Paletės peilio ašmenų krašto profilis: Nuožulnus; Dantytas; Smailus; Suapvalintas; Kvadratinis; Tiesus; Smailėjantis; Kita
de: Kantenprofil der Palettenmesserklinge: Abgeschrägt; Gekerbt; Spitz; Abgerundet; Quadratisch; Gerade; Konisch; Sonstige
zh-CN: 调色刀刀刃边缘轮廓: 斜边; 齿状; 尖头; 圆头; 方头; 直边; 锥形; 其他
tr: Palet bıçağı kenar profili: Eğimli; Çentikli; Sivri; Yuvarlak; Kare; Düz; Daralan; Diğer
pl: Profil krawędzi ostrza szpachelki malarskiej: Ścięta; Ząbkowana; Szpiczasta; Zaokrąglona; Kwadratowa; Prosta; Zwężana; Inne
pt-BR: Perfil da borda da lâmina da espátula: Chanfrado; Entalhado; Pontudo; Arredondado; Quadrado; Reto; Afilado; Outro
el: Προφίλ ακμής μαχαιριού παλέτας: Φαλτσοκομμένο; Οδοντωτό; Μυτερό; Στρογγυλεμένο; Τετράγωνο; Ίσιο; Κωνικό; Άλλο
vi: Hình dạng cạnh lưỡi dao phết sơn: Vát; Có rãnh khía; Nhọn; Bo tròn; Vuông; Thẳng; Thuôn; Khác
hr-HR: Profil oštrice paletnog noža: Zakošen; Urezan; Šiljat; Zaobljen; Kvadratni; Ravan; Sužen; Ostalo
es: Perfil del filo de la espátula: Biselado; Dentado; Puntiagudo; Redondeado; Cuadrado; Recto; Afilado; Otro
zh-TW: 調色刀刀刃輪廓: 斜角; 鋸齒; 尖形; 圓形; 方形; 直形; 錐形; 其他
nb: Kantprofil for palettknivblad: Skråkant; Takket; Spiss; Avrundet; Kvadratisk; Rett; Konisk; Annet
sl-SI: Profil roba rezila slikarske lopatice: Poševni; Zarezan; Koničast; Zaobljen; Kvadratni; Ravni; Zožen; Drugo